Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Penalties

179.990.
Penalties.

Any county engineer who fails to comply with the provisions of subsection (3) of KRS

179.040

shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500).

Any person who fails to perform the duties imposed by KRS

179.220

and

179.230

shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).

Any county engineer who fails to publish the notices required by KRS

179.230

shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25), nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who violates subsection (2) of KRS

179.240

shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).

Any railroad company that fails to comply with the provisions of KRS

179.290

within the specified time, shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each failure.

Any county engineer who willfully fails to comply with the provisions of KRS

179.320

for sixty (60) days after the fiscal court has ordered the guideboards to be erected, shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars ($25).

Any person who violates subsection (4) of KRS

179.330

, shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

Any owner of a toll bridge who fails to repair the bridge when ordered to do so under the provisions of KRS

179.360

shall be fined fifty dollars ($50).

Any person who violates subsection (4) of KRS

179.370

shall be fined not less than five dollars ($5) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25).

Any person who violates subsection (2) of KRS

179.380

shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).

Any county engineer who violates KRS

179.460

shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

Any county engineer who fails to perform the duties of his office shall, unless a different penalty is prescribed, be fined not over one hundred dollars ($100).

Any county engineer who fails to cause contractors for county road and bridge work to perform their duties shall be fined not over one hundred dollars ($100).

Any county engineer who fails to prosecute for any penalty provided in KRS Chapters 178 and 179, knowing that the penalty has been incurred, shall be fined twenty-five dollars ($25) for each failure to prosecute.

If a fiscal court or county judge/executive willfully fails to perform any duty required of it by the provisions of this chapter, except KRS

179.230

and

179.320

, every member of the court concurring in the failure shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) by the Circuit Court of the county.

All fines imposed by this chapter shall be paid into the county road fund.

No fine imposed by this chapter shall bar an action for damages for breach of contract.

Any person, subdivider, builder, contractor or developer of any construction project who violates subsection (2) of KRS

179.070

shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.

History.

4320, 4324-1, 4327, 4342a-3, 4343, 4346, 4349, 4350, 4353a-2, 4356b, 4356c, 4356e, 4356f, 4356h, 4356n, 4356o, 4356q: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 210, § 25; 1972, ch. 348, § 2; 1978, ch. 384, § 320, effective June 17, 1978.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(9/2/92). The former reference to subsection (13) of KRS

179.070

contained in subsection (18) of this statute has been changed to subsection (2) because of the internal renumbering of KRS

179.070

.